Illinois, session 104th, HB3841.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-185 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)7    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 8may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 9used in this Division 5: 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 11All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 12States Department of Labor. 13    "Extension limitation" means (a) the lesser of 5% or the 14percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1512-month calendar year preceding the levy year or (b) the rate 16of increase approved by voters under Section 18-205. 17    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 19more inhabitants. 20    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 211-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 221991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 23only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of   HB3841- 2 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 2counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 4district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 5subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 6rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 7levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 8value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 9levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 10district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 11includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 12provided in Section 18-213. 13    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 14Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 15corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 16purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 17district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 18the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 20for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 21general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 22made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 23bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 24issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 25district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 26refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1,   HB3841- 3 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b11991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 2district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 3before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 4or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 5pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 6principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 7governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 8other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 9payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 10lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 11issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 12building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 13contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 14payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 15Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 16construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 17made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 18as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 19Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 20less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 21definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 22initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 23of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 24the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 25district that participates in the Special Education District 26of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement   HB3841- 4 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 2school district's share of the amounts required to be 3contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 4to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 5the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 6this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 7county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 8recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 9Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 10the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 11loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1217-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 13and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 14Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 15to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 16Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 17under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 18(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 19assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 20liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 21district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 22the Illinois Highway Code; and (q) made under Section 4 of the 23Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 24to supplement existing funds for community mental health 25facilities and services, including facilities and services for 26the person with a developmental disability or a substance use   HB3841- 5 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1disorder; and (r) (q) made for the payment of principal and 2interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 317-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 4those bonds. 5    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 6this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 7districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 818-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 9district and those special purpose extensions that are made 10annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 11extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 12or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 13referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 14or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 151, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 16principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 17those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 18taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 19to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 201995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 21district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 22before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 23or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 24pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 25principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 26governing body of the unit of local government finds that all   HB3841- 6 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 2payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 3lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 4issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 5building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 6contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 7payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 8Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 9construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 10made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 11Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 12of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 13for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 14Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 15Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 16under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 17payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 18defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 19in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 20the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 21non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 22issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 23subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 24payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 25Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 26for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by   HB3841- 7 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 2Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 3issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 4the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 5established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 6made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 7authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 8pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 9District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 10Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 11(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 12Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 13pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 14annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 15recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 16Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 17the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 18District for recreational programs for persons with 19disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 20Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 21firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 22Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 23under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 24(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 2517-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 26employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension   HB3841- 8 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 2School Code; and (s) made under Section 4 of the Community 3Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to 4supplement existing funds for community mental health 5facilities and services, including facilities and services for 6the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 7disorder; and (t) (s) made for the payment of principal and 8interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 917-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 10those bonds. 11    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 12this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 13those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 14(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 15for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 16that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 17special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 18to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 19were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 20to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 21issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 22applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 23taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 24to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 25date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 26taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to   HB3841- 9 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 2continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 3referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 4is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 5on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 6taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 7pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 8date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 9taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 10levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 11government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 12interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 13the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 14all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 15payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 16lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 17issued by the commission before the date on which the 18referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 19is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 20due under installment contracts entered into before the date 21on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 22taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 23and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 24Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 25the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 26(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum   HB3841- 10 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 2referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 3bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 4Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 5interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 6the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 7airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 8installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 9before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 10a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 11fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 12persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 13District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 14Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 15fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 16the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 174-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 18district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 19bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 20and (n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act 21to provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 22for community mental health facilities and services, including 23facilities and services for the person with a developmental 24disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) (n) made for 25the payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued 26under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to   HB3841- 11 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1refund or continue to refund those bonds. 2    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 3this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 4subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 5extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 6extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 7excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 8district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 9bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 10taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 11obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 12date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 13pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 14continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 15(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 16taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 17to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 181997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 19were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 20date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 21pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 227, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 23of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 24the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 25payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 26only after the governing body of the unit of local government   HB3841- 12 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 2make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 3commission lease when the lease payments are for the 4retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 51997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 6building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 7contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 8date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 9and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 10Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 11the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 12(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 13obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 14referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 15bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 16Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 17interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 18the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 19airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 20installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 21before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 22a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 23fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 24persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 25District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 26Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension   HB3841- 13 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 2the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 34-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (m) made under Section 44 of the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary 5funds or to supplement existing funds for community mental 6health facilities and services, including facilities and 7services for the person with a developmental disability or a 8substance use disorder; and (n) (m) made for the payment of 9principal and interest on any bonds issued under the authority 10of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue 11to refund those bonds. 12    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 13that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 141994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 15Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 16subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 17for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 18applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 19districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 20of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 21constituting an extension for payment of principal and 22interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 23referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 24For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 251991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 26for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by   HB3841- 14 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1the park district without referendum (but not including 2excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 3for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 4of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 5without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 6bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 7that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 8constituting an extension for payment of principal and 9interest on bonds issued by the park district without 10referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 11A debt service extension base established or increased at any 12time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 1318-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 14of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 15this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 16lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 17Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the levy 18year. The debt service extension base may be established or 19increased as provided under Section 18-212. "Excluded 20non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by Public Act 2188-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park 22District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 23issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 24Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 25continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 26referendum. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the   HB3841- 15 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1debt service extension base shall be suspended for park 2districts for the 2026 levy year. 3    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 4to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 5unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 6contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 7to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 8district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 9The extension for a special service area is not included in the 10aggregate extension. 11    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 12last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1318-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 14levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 15Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 16base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 17adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 18levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 19counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 20estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 21taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 22in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 23decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 24as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 25required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 26the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the   HB3841- 16 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 2the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 3rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 4calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 5(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 6been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.7    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 82012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 9District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 10    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 11purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 12the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 13School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 152022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 16program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 17levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 18shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 19base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 20levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 21    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 221-155. 23    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 24board of review or board of appeals action, of new 25improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 26parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of   HB3841- 17 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 2equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 317-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 4board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 5estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 6estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 7levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 8Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 9upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 10is complete, of any real property located within the 11boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 12reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 13or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 14counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 15IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 16additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 17in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 18board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 19assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 20well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 21Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 22during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 23in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 24include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 25school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 26applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations.   HB3841- 18 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 2organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 3county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 4population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 5    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 6provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 7equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 8municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 9redevelopment project area previously established under the 10Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 11Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 12Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 13established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 14Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 15Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 16each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 17the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 18equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 19project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 20levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 21rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 22the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 23assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 24increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 25area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 26established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment   HB3841- 19 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 2under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 3Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 4Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 5equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 6lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 7redevelopment project area over and above the initial 8equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 9project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 10taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 11redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 12Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 13the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 14Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 15Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 16amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 17taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 18from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 19equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 20from the redevelopment project area. 21    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 22rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 23preceding aggregate extension base times an amount equal to 24one plus the extension limitation defined in this Section and 25the denominator of which is the current year's equalized 26assessed value of all real property in the territory under the   HB3841- 20 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 2year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 3extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 4districts that reduced their extension for educational 5purposes pursuant to Section 18-206, the highest aggregate 6extension in any of the last 3 preceding levy years shall be 7used for the purpose of computing the limiting rate. The 8denominator shall not include new property or the recovered 9tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate decrease, or a 10limiting rate increase has been approved at an election held 11after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise applicable 12limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of the new rate 13or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate decrease, as the 14case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting rate increase, 15the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set forth in the 16proposition approved by the voters for each of the years 17specified in the proposition, after which the limiting rate of 18the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise provided. 19In the case of a taxing district that obtained referendum 20approval for an increased limiting rate on March 20, 2012, the 21limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate that 22generates the approximate total amount of taxes extendable for 23that tax year, as set forth in the proposition approved by the 24voters; this rate shall be the final rate applied by the county 25clerk for the aggregate of all capped funds of the district for 26tax year 2012.  HB3841- 21 -LRB104 11444 HLH 21532 b1(Source: P.A. 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-311, eff. 8-6-21; 2102-519, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-707, eff. 34-22-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 4103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 103-591, eff. 57-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; revised 7-9-24.)